el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες > Αξεσουάρ μουσικών οργάνων & ορχήστρας > Αξεσουάρ ενισχυτών μουσικών οργάνων: Καμπίνες ενισχυτών μουσικών οργάνων; Καλύμματα & θήκες ενισχυτή μουσικών οργάνων; Ποδοδιακόπτες ενισχυτή μουσικών οργάνων; Κουμπιά ενισχυτών μουσικών οργάνων; Βάσεις ενισχυτών μουσικών οργάνων; Λυχνίες ενισχυτών μουσικών οργάνων
fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet > Soitin- ja orkesteritarvikkeet > Vahvistintarvikkeet: Vahvistinkaapit; Vahvistinten suojat ja kotelot; Soitinvahvistimen jalkakytkimet; Soitinvahvistimen nupit; Soitinvahvistimen telineet; Soitinvahvistimen putket
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo > Phụ kiện dàn nhạc và nhạc cụ > Phụ kiện bộ khuếch đại nhạc cụ: Bộ khuếch đại âm thanh cho nhạc cụ; Vỏ bọc và hộp đựng bộ khuếch đại nhạc cụ; Bộ điều khiển chân dành cho bộ khuếch đại nhạc cụ; Núm chỉnh bộ khuếch đại nhạc cụ; Chân loa; Ống khuếch đại nhạc cụ
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество > Аксессуары для музыкальных инструментов и игры в оркестре > Аксессуары для усилителей для музыкальных инструментов: Кабинеты для усилителей для музыкальных инструментов; Чехлы и ящики для усилителей для музыкальных инструментов; Педали для усилителей для музыкальных инструментов; Ручки-регуляторы для усилителей для музыкальных инструментов; Стойки для усилителей для музыкальных инструментов; Электронные лампы для усилителей для музыкальных инструментов
es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas > Accesorios para instrumentos musicales y de orquesta > Accesorios para amplificadores de instrumentos musicales: Muebles para amplificadores de instrumentos musicales; Fundas para amplificadores de instrumentos musicales; Pedales para amplificadores de instrumentos musicales; Diales para amplificadores de instrumentos musicales; Bases para amplificadores de instrumentos musicales; Tubos para amplificadores de instrumentos musicales
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства > Аксесоари за музикални инструменти и оркестри > Аксесоари за усилватели на музикални инструменти: Шкафове за усилватели на музикални инструменти; Калъфи и куфари за усилватели за музикални инструменти; Крачни превключватели за усилватели на музикални инструменти; Копчета за усилватели на музикални инструменти; Стойки за усилватели на музикални инструменти; Лампи за усилватели на музикални инструменти
fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs > Accessoires pour instruments de musique et orchestres > Accessoires pour amplificateurs: Baffles pour ampli; Housses de protection pour amplificateurs; Interrupteurs au pied pour amplificateurs; Boutons d’amplificateurs; Supports pour amplificateurs; Amplificateurs à tubes
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne > Príslušenstvo pre hudobné nástroje > Príslušenstvo k zosilňovačom hudobných nástrojov: Skrinky na zosilňovače hudobných nástrojov; Kryty a puzdrá na zosilňovače hudobných nástrojov; Nožné spínače zosilňovačov hudobných nástrojov; Gombíky zosilňovačov hudobných nástrojov; Stojany na zosilňovače hudobných nástrojov; Elektrónky zosilňovačov hudobných nástrojov
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술 > 악기/오케스트라 부대용품 > 악기 앰프 부대용품: 악기 앰프 캐비닛; 악기 앰프 커버/케이스; 악기 앰프 풋 스위치; 악기 앰프 노브; 악기 앰프 스탠드; 악기 앰프 진공관
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet > Hangszer és zenekari kiegészítők > Hangszererősítő kiegészítők: Hangszererősítő szekrények; Hangszererősítő huzatok és tokok; Hangszererősítő lábkapcsolók; Hangszererősítő gombok; Hangszererősítő állványok; Hangszererősítő csövek
en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts > Musical Instrument & Orchestra Accessories > Musical Instrument Amplifier Accessories: Musical Instrument Amplifier Cabinets; Musical Instrument Amplifier Covers & Cases; Musical Instrument Amplifier Footswitches; Musical Instrument Amplifier Knobs; Musical Instrument Amplifier Stands; Musical Instrument Amplifier Tubes
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์ > เครื่องดนตรีและอุปกรณ์ออร์เคสตรา > อุปกรณ์สำหรับแอมพลิฟายเออร์เครื่องดนตรี: ตู้แอมป์เครื่องดนตรี; ที่คลุมและกล่องใส่แอมพลิฟายเออร์เครื่องดนตรี; แอมพลิฟายเออร์เครื่องดนตรีแบบมีสวิทตช์ที่เท้า; ปุ่มปรับแอมพลิฟายเออร์; ขาตั้งแอมป์เครื่องดนตรี; หลอดสุญญากาศแอมพลิฟายเออร์
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes > Acessórios para instrumentos musicais e orquestras > Acessórios de amplificadores para instrumentos musicais: Caixas para amplificadores de instrumentos musicais; Capas de amplificadores para instrumentos musicais; Pedais amplificadores para instrumentos musicais; Botões de amplificadores para instrumentos musicais; Suportes para amplificadores de instrumentos musicais; Tubos de amplificadores para instrumentos musicais
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti > Dodatki za glasbila in orkestre > Dodatki za ojačevalnike glasbil: Omare za ojačevalnike glasbil; Pokrovi in ohišja za ojačevalnike glasbil; Stopalke za ojačevalnike glasbil; Gumbi za ojačevalnike glasbil; Stojala za ojačevalnike glasbil; Cevi za ojačevalnike glasbil
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション > 楽器関連用品 > 楽器用アンプ用品: 楽器用アンプキャビネット; 楽器用アンプカバー; 楽器用アンプフットスイッチ; 楽器用アンプノブ; 楽器用アンプスタンド; 楽器用アンプ真空管
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst > Zubehör für Musikinstrumente > Verstärkerzubehör: Verstärkergehäuse; Verstärkerabdeckungen; Verstärker-Fußschalter; Verstärkerknöpfe; Ständer für Verstärker; Verstärkerröhren
nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet > Tilbehør til musikkinstrumenter og orkestre > Tilbehør til musikkforsterkere: Kabinetter til musikkforsterkere; Deksler og vesker til musikkforsterkere; Fotbrytere til musikkforsterkere; Brytere til musikkforsterkere; Stativer til musikkforsterkere; Rør til musikkforsterkere
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden > Accessoires voor muziekinstrumenten > Accessoires voor versterkers voor muziekinstrumenten: Versterkerkasten voor muziekinstrumenten; Hoezen voor versterkers voor muziekinstrumenten; Pedalen voor versterkers voor muziekinstrumenten; Knoppen voor versterkers voor muziekinstrumenten; Versterkerstandaards voor muziekinstrumenten; Buizen voor versterkers voor muziekinstrumenten
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar > Müzik Aleti ve Orkestra Aksesuarları > Müzik Aleti Amfi Aksesuarları: Müzik Aleti Amfi Kabinleri; Müzik Aleti Amfi Saklama Kabinleri; Müzik Aleti Amfi Pedalları; Müzik Aleti Amfi Düğmeleri; Müzik Aleti Amplifikatör Stantları; Müzik Aleti Amfi Tüpleri
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění > Hudební nástroje – příslušenství > Nástrojové aparatury – příslušenství: Nástrojová komba; Nástrojové aparatury – obaly a kufry; Nástrojové aparatury – nožní přepínače a pedalboardy; Nástrojové aparatury – knoflíky; Nástrojové aparatury – stojany; Nástrojové aparatury – elektronky
zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術 > 樂器配件 > 樂器音箱配件: 樂器擴大音箱; 樂器音箱保護套/盒; 樂器音箱踏板; 樂器擴大機轉扭; 樂器擴大機立架; 樂器擴大機真空管
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne > Akcesoria do instrumentów muzycznych > Akcesoria do wzmacniaczy do instrumentów muzycznych: Wzmacniacze kolumnowe do instrumentów muzycznych; Pokrowce na wzmacniacze do instrumentów muzycznych; Przełączniki nożne do wzmacniaczy do instrumentów muzycznych; Pokrętła do wzmacniaczy do instrumentów muzycznych; Stojaki na wzmacniacze; Wzmacniacze basowe do instrumentów muzycznych
sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande > Tillbehör till musikinstrument > Förstärkartillbehör för musikinstrument: Förstärkarskåp för musikinstrument; Överdrag till förstärkare för musikinstrument; Fotomkopplare till förstärkare för musikinstrument; Rattar till förstärkare för musikinstrument; Ställningar för instrumentförstärkare; Rör till förstärkare för musikinstrument
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas > Acessórios de instrumentos musicais e orquestra > Acessórios de amplificador de instrumento musical: Cabines de amplificador de instrumento musical; Estojos e proteções de amplificador de instrumento musical; Interruptores de pé de amplificador de instrumento musical; Botões de amplificador de instrumento musical; Suportes de amplificador de instrumento musical; Tubos de amplificador de instrumento musical
it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative > Accessori per orchestre e strumenti musicali > Accessori per amplificatori di strumenti musicali: Amplificatori per strumenti musicali; Custodie per amplificatori di strumenti musicali; Pedaliere per amplificatori di strumenti musicali; Manopole per amplificatori di strumenti musicali; Supporti per amplificatori per strumenti musicali; Valvole per amplificatori di strumenti musicali
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti > Pribor za glazbala i orkestar > Dodaci za pojačala za glazbala: Ormari za pojačala za glazbala; Navlake i koferi za pojačala za glazbala; Nožni prekidači pojačala za glazbala; Gumbi pojačala za glazbala; Stalci za pojačala za glazbala; Cijevi za pojačala za glazbala
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai > Muzikos instrumentai ir orkestro priedai > Muzikos instrumentų stiprintuvų priedai: Muzikos instrumentų stiprintuvų korpusai; Muzikos instrumentų stiprintuvų gaubtai ir dėklai; Muzikos instrumentų stiprintuvų pedalai; Muzikos instrumentų stiprintuvų rankenėlės; Muzikos instrumentų stiprintuvų stovai; Muzikos instrumentų stiprintuvų lempos
ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă > Accesorii pentru instrumente muzicale și orchestră > Accesorii pentru amplificator pentru instrumente muzicale: Dulapuri pentru amplificator pentru instrumente muzicale; Huse și carcase pentru amplificator pentru instrumente muzicale; Pedale de picior pentru amplificator pentru instrumente muzicale; Butoane pentru amplificator pentru instrumente muzicale; Stative pentru amplificator pentru instrumente muzicale; Tuburi pentru amplificator pentru instrumente muzicale
da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde > Musikinstrumenter – tilbehør > Forstærkertilbehør til musikinstrumenter: Musikinstrument – forstærkerkabinetter; Forstærkerovertræk til musikinstrumenter; Forstærkerfodpedal til musikinstrumenter; Forstærkerknapper til musikinstrumenter; Stativer til forstærkere til musikinstrumenter; Forstærkerrør til musikinstrumenter
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作 > 乐器与管弦乐队配件 > 乐器音箱配件: 乐器扩音箱; 乐器扩音器护罩和箱子; 乐器音箱脚踏控制器; 乐器扩音器旋钮; 乐器扩音器支架; 乐器扩音器电子管